Massachusetts, session 194th, S1756.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 48A of chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after "superintendent may so expend any part or
all of such money” the following words:- “However, the superintendent may not deduct from
money earned by any inmate for room, board, or any living-related expenses.”
Section 2. The Department of Correction shall promulgate regulations pursuant to this
section no later than 30 days after the enactment of this act.
Section 3. The amendment of Section 48A shall apply retroactively to all such deductions
made from inmate earnings for room, board, or living-related expenses after January 1, 2020.
Any such deductions that occurred prior to the enactment of this bill shall be refunded to the
affected individuals.
Section 4. Section 58 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the paragraph that begins with “The court
of 2

may make an order for payment…” in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:-
“The court may not make an order for payment by the child's parents or guardian from the child's
property, or by any other person responsible for the care and support of said child, to the
institution, department, division, organization or person furnishing care and support for said
child.”
Section 4. The Juvenile Court shall immediately cease the issuance of payment orders for
the care and support of delinquent youth upon the enactment of this act.
Section 5. The amendment of Section 58 shall apply retroactively to any youth for whom
payment orders were issued after January 1, 2020. Any such payment orders shall be deemed
void and any orders already fulfilled shall be refunded to the impacted youths or their families.
Section 6. The Commonwealth shall ensure that the costs associated with the care and
accommodation of incarcerated individuals are not passed on to the individuals themselves or
their families.
of 2